Illinois, session 104th, HB4147.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Home 5Utility Relief Act. 6    Section 5. Home Utility Rebate Program. 7    (a) As soon as practicable, the Department of Commerce and 8Economic Opportunity shall create a Home Utility Rebate 9Program to provide rebates to households that use electricity 10and that have a median household income between 100% and 500% 11of the poverty guidelines updated periodically in the Federal 12Register by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services 13under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2). Eligible households 14shall receive the rebates as soon as practicable after 15implementation of the program. The Department shall, by rule, 16establish qualifications for program participation, which may 17include requirements that apply under the Energy Assistance 18Act and other requirements.19    (b) Rebates provided under the program shall be funded 20through appropriations made from the Home Utility Rebate 21Relief Fund created under Section 10. The State Comptroller 22shall direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer 23$500,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the Home Utility   HB4147- 2 -LRB104 15720 KTG 28903 b1Rebate Relief Fund to provide rebates to qualifying households 2for State fiscal years 2026 and 2027. Any funds left over at 3the end of the second month following the conclusion of 4payments to households in a fiscal year may be awarded to 5certain qualifying first-time small business owners as 6determined by the Department. 7    (c) The Department shall adopt emergency rules in 8accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act to 9implement the Home Utility Rebate Program.  10    Section 10. Home Utility Rebate Relief Fund. The Home 11Utility Rebate Relief Fund is created as a special fund in the 12State treasury. The Fund shall consist of any moneys deposited 13into the Fund as provided under subsection (b) of Section 5. 14Moneys in the Fund shall be expended for the Home Utility 15Rebate Program as provided under Section 5 and for no other 16purpose. All interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall be 17deposited into the Fund. 18    Section 15. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 19amended by adding Section 5-45.70 as follows: 20    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.70 new)21    Sec. 5-45.70. Emergency rulemaking; Home Utility Rebate 22Program. To provide for the expeditious and timely 23implementation of the Home Utility Rebate Program authorized   HB4147- 3 -LRB104 15720 KTG 28903 b1under the Home Utility Relief Act, emergency rules 2implementing the Home Utility Rebate Program may be adopted in 3accordance with Section 5-45 by the Department of Commerce and 4Economic Opportunity. The adoption of emergency rules 5authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be 6necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.7    This Section is repealed 3 years after the effective date 8of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 9    Section 20. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 10Section 5.1038 as follows: 11    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)12    Sec. 5.1038. The Home Utility Rebate Relief Fund. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.